Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Employment and Tenure.

Cross references. —

For provisions related to sick leave, see AS

14.14.105

and

14.14.107

.

Administrative Code. —

For allowances for professional personnel, see 4 AAC 15.

For employment of professional personnel, see 4 AAC 18.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 156 et seq.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 191 et seq.

Teacher’s civil liability for administering corporal punishment. 43 ALR2d 469.

Right of school teacher to serve as member of school board in same school district where employed. 70 ALR3d 1188.

Who is “teacher” for purposes of tenure statute. 94 ALR3d 141.

Personal liability of public school teacher in negligence action for personal injury or death of student. 34 ALR4th 228.

Personal liability of public school executive or administrative officer in negligence action for personal injury or death of student. 35 ALR4th 272.

Personal liability in negligence action of public school employee, other than teacher or executive or administrative officer, for personal injury or death of student. 35 ALR4th 328.

Validity and construction of statutes, ordinances, or regulations requiring competency tests of schoolteachers. 64 ALR4th 642.

Validity, construction and effect of municipal residency requirements for teachers, principals, and other school employees. 75 ALR4th 272.

Liability of school or school personnel in connection with suicide of student. 17 ALR5th 179.

Liability of school or school personnel for injury to student resulting from cheerleader activities. 25 ALR5th 784.

Sec. 14.20.095.
Right to comment and criticize not to be restricted.

A bylaw or regulation of the commissioner, a school board, or local school administrator may not restrict or modify the right of a teacher to engage in comment and criticism outside school hours, regarding school personnel, members of the governing body of any school or school district, any other public official, or any school employee, to the same extent that any private individual may exercise the right.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 1965; am § 13 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.097.
Duty-free time.

Each governing body shall allow its teachers in school facilities with four or more teachers a daily duty-free mealtime of at least 30 minutes reasonably scheduled during the middle of the teacher’s workday.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1996)

Sec. 14.20.100.
Unlawful to require statement of religious or political affiliation.

A school board, or a member of a school board, may not require or compel a person applying for the position of teacher in the public schools of the state to state a religious or political affiliation.

History.

(§ 37-5-1 ACLA 1949)

Collateral references. —

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to college curators. 18 ALR2d 303.

Dismissal or rejection of public schoolteacher because of disloyalty. 27 ALR2d 487.

Sec. 14.20.110.
Penalty for violation of AS 14.20.100.

A person violating AS

14.20.100

is punishable by a fine of not more than $100.

History.

(§ 37-5-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 14.20.120.
Statement of qualifications.

A statement of the qualifications of each teacher and superintendent employed by the state or a school district shall be filed with the commissioner.
The statement must contain the credits earned in college, normal school, or university, and the number of years of teaching experience both in the state and elsewhere in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 37-6-5 ACLA 1949; am § 5 ch 179 SLA 1957; am § 12 ch 46 SLA 1970)

Sec. 14.20.130.
Employment contracts.

An employer may, after January 1, issue contracts for the following school year to employees regularly qualified in accordance with the regulations of the department.
The contract for a superintendent may be for more than one school year but may not exceed three consecutive school years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 92 SLA 1960; am § 14 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For employment of professional personnel, see 4 AAC 18.

Sec. 14.20.135.
Employment of retired teachers because of shortages. [Repealed by, § 12 ch 57 SLA 2001 as amended by § 10 ch 50 SLA 2005, effective July 1, 2009.]

Sec. 14.20.136.
Reemployment of member of teachers’ retirement system.

Subject to (b) — (d) of this section, a school district may reemploy a member who is retired under a retirement plan established in AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, or a member who is retired under a retirement plan established in AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

. In this subsection, “school district” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

.

A member who is retired under AS

14.25.110(a)

may not be reemployed under (a) of this section unless the member

certifies that the member and the school district did not arrange before the member retired from the school district for the member to be reemployed by the school district after the member retired; and

has been retired for at least

60 days if the member is at least 62 years of age; or

six months if the member is less than 62 years of age.

Before reemploying a retired member under (a) of this section to fill a position, a school district shall

by resolution, adopt a policy that describes the circumstances of a shortage or anticipated shortage of applicants, other than retired members, who are qualified for particular positions and permits rehiring that complies with the requirements of this section; and

publicly advertise the position for 10 business days and actively recruit to fill the position by hiring a person other than a member who is retired.

A contract for reemployment under (a) of this section may not exceed 12 consecutive months.

A school district that reemploys a member under this section who is retired under the defined benefit retirement plan established in AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

is required to

provide the administrator with

a copy of the resolution and policy adopted under (c) of this section; and

for every retired member who is rehired, a report identifying the member by name and describing the

circumstances of the shortage that necessitated the rehire; and

actions taken by the school district to comply with school district policy adopted under (c) of this section and the requirements of this section; and

make contributions under AS

14.25.070

.

The requirements of (c), (d), and (e)(1) of this section do not apply to the rehire of a member who is eligible for restoration of tenure rights under AS

14.20.165

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 81 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision providing that this section “applies to contracts made on or after November 8, 2018”, see sec. 6, ch. 81, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 81, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on November 8, 2018.

Sec. 14.20.140.
Notification of lay off or nonretention.

If a teacher who has acquired tenure rights is to be laid off under AS

14.20.177

or is not to be retained for the following school year, the employer shall notify the teacher of the layoff or nonretention by writing, delivered before May 15, or by registered mail postmarked before May 15.

If a teacher who has not acquired tenure rights is to be laid off under AS

14.20.177

or is not to be retained for the following school year the employer shall notify the teacher of the layoff or nonretention by writing delivered on or before the last day of the school term or by registered mail postmarked on or before the last day of the school term.

Notwithstanding a teacher’s right to continued employment under AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

, a school district may notify a teacher of layoff or nonretention under this section for the following school year for a permissible reason.

History.

(§ 1 ch 92 SLA 1960; am § 15 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 96 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 69 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (c), “AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

” was substituted for “AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 11, 2013, in (a), substituted “May 15” for “March 16” twice.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 5, ch. 69, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to (a) of this section apply “to a contract or collective bargaining agreement that becomes legally binding on or after July 11, 2013.”

Sec. 14.20.145.
Automatic reemployment.

If notification of nonretention or layoff is not given according to AS

14.20.140

, a teacher is entitled to be reemployed in the same district for the following school year on the contract terms the teacher and the employer may agree upon, or, if no terms are agreed upon, the provisions of the previous contract are continued for the following school year, subject to AS

14.20.158

. Except as provided in AS

14.20.177(e)

, the right to automatic reemployment under this section expires if the teacher does not accept reemployment within 30 days after the date on which the teacher receives a contract of reemployment. A teacher who is on family leave under AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

must comply with the 30-day deadline in this section to retain the teacher’s reemployment rights under this section.

History.

(§ 16 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 96 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002 “AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

” was substituted for “AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A teacher who has not been given proper notice of nonretention has an enforceable right to a written contract of employment for the next school year. That contract would contain terms like those in the teacher’s contract for the preceding year, subject to modification under AS

14.20.158

or in ways not specifically enumerated by AS

14.20.158

where such modifications are necessary to protect the reasonable expectations of the parties. The teacher would be entitled to a new written contract each year based on the terms of the preceding year’s contract, unless the terms were varied by agreement. March 25, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.20.147.
Transfer or absorption of attendance area and teachers.

When an attendance area is transferred from a currently operating district to, or absorbed into, a new or existing school district, the teachers for the attendance area also shall be transferred unless otherwise mutually agreed by the teacher or teachers and the chief school administrator of the new district if the district employs a chief school administrator. Accumulated or earned benefits, including seniority, salary level, tenure, leave, and retirement, accompany the teacher who is transferred.

[Repealed, § 48 ch 15 SLA 2014.]

On the first day of service in the absorbing school district, a teacher transferred from a federal agency school shall be allowed the actual number of days of accumulated sick leave that the teacher has earned while teaching in the state. Consistent with the established district policy the absorbing district may allow credit for any other type of leave. Credit for retirement shall be allowed in accordance with AS

14.25.060

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 53 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 150 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 31 SLA 1996; am § 26 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 48 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, repealed (b).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 31, SLA 1996 provides that the amendments to subsection (b) made by ch. 31, SLA 1996 apply only to an individual (1) first hired as a teacher by a school district or regional educational attendance area, including Mt. Edgecumbe High School, on or after August 16, 1996, or (2) rehired as a teacher by a school district or regional educational attendance area, including Mt. Edgecumbe High School, on or after August 16, 1996 and following an interruption in continuous service and the interruption resulted either in a loss of tenure rights under AS

14.20.160

or in a failure to acquire tenure rights under AS

14.20.150

.

Sec. 14.20.148.
Intradistrict teacher reassignments.

When a teacher is involuntarily transferred or reassigned to a position for which the teacher is qualified, within the district, the teacher’s moving expenses shall be paid unless the one-way driving distance is 20 miles or less from the teacher’s present place of residence, or unless otherwise mutually agreed by the teacher and chief school administrator of the district if the district employs a chief school administrator.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1972; am § 27 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Sec. 14.20.149.
Employee evaluation.

A school board shall adopt a certificated employee evaluation system for evaluation and improvement of the performance of the district’s teachers and administrators. The evaluation system applies to all the district’s certificated employees except the district’s superintendent. A school board shall consider information from students, parents, community members, classroom teachers, affected collective bargaining units, and administrators in the design and periodic review of the district’s certificated employee evaluation system. An evaluation of a certificated employee under this section must be based on observation of the employee in the employee’s workplace.

The certificated employee evaluation system must

establish district performance standards for the district’s teachers and administrators that are based on professional performance standards adopted by the department by regulation;

require at least two observations for the evaluation of each nontenured teacher in the district each school year;

require at least an annual evaluation of each tenured teacher in the district who met the district performance standards during the previous school year;

permit the district to limit its evaluations of tenured teachers who have consistently exceeded the district performance standards to one evaluation every two school years;

require the school district to perform an annual evaluation for each administrator;

require the school district to prepare and implement a plan of improvement for a teacher or administrator whose performance did not meet the district performance standards, except if the teacher’s or administrator’s performance warrants immediate dismissal under AS

14.20.170(a)

; and

provide an opportunity for students, parents, community members, teachers, and administrators to provide information on the performance of the teacher or administrator who is the subject of the evaluation to the evaluating administrator.

A person may not conduct an evaluation under this section unless the person holds a type B certificate or is a site administrator under the supervision of a person with a type B certificate, is employed by the school district as an administrator, and has completed training in the use of the school district’s teacher evaluation system.

A school district shall offer in-service training to the certificated employees who are subject to the evaluation system on a schedule adopted by the governing body of a school district. The training must address the procedures of the evaluation system, the standards that the district uses in evaluating the performance of teachers and administrators, and other information that the district considers helpful.

A school district shall provide a tenured teacher whose performance, after evaluation, did not meet the district performance standards with a plan of improvement. The evaluating administrator shall consult with the tenured teacher in setting clear, specific performance expectations to be included in the plan of improvement. The plan of improvement must address ways in which the tenured teacher’s performance can be improved and shall last for not less than 90 workdays and not more than 180 workdays unless the minimum time is shortened by agreement between the evaluating administrator and the teacher. The plan of improvement shall be based on the professional performance standards outlined in the locally adopted school district evaluation procedure. The school district must observe the teacher at least twice during the course of the plan. If, at the conclusion of the plan of improvement, the tenured teacher’s performance again does not meet the district performance standards, the district may nonretain the teacher under AS

14.20.175(b)(1)

.

A school district may place an administrator who has previously acquired tenure, whose performance, including performance as an evaluator under the district’s certificated employee evaluation system, does not meet the district performance standards on a plan of improvement. The plan must address ways in which the administrator’s performance can be improved and shall last for not less than 90 workdays and not more than 210 workdays unless the minimum time is shortened by agreement between the evaluating administrator and the administrator being evaluated. The school district must observe the administrator being evaluated at least twice during the course of the plan. If, at the conclusion of the plan of improvement, the administrator’s performance again does not meet the district performance standards, the district may terminate its employment contract with the administrator. This subsection does not restrict the right of a school district to reassign an administrator to a teaching position consistent with the terms of an applicable collective bargaining agreement.

The department may request copies of each school district’s certificated employee evaluation system and changes the district makes to the system.

Information provided to a school district under the school district’s certificated employee evaluation system concerning the performance of an individual being evaluated under the system is not a public record and is not subject to disclosure under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

. However, the individual who is the subject of the evaluation is entitled to a copy of the information and may waive the confidentiality provisions of this subsection concerning the information.

History.

(§ 4 ch 31 SLA 1996; am § 17 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 11 ch 2 SSSLA 2015; am § 20 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 40.25” was substituted for “AS 09.25” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (a), deleted “by July 1, 1997,” following “A school board shall adopt”.

The first 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, substituted “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

” for “AS 40.25” at the end of the first sentence of (h).

The second 2015 amendment, effective October 7, 2015, in the first sentence of (d), substituted “A school district” for “Once each school year, a school district” at the beginning, and added “on a schedule adopted by the governing body of a school district” at the end.

Sec. 14.20.150.
Acquisition and reacquisition of tenure rights.

Except as provided in (c) or (d) of this section, a teacher acquires tenure rights in a district when the teacher

possesses a valid teaching certificate that authorizes the teacher to be employed as a certificated teacher or as an administrator under regulations adopted by the department;

has been employed as a teacher in the same district continuously for three full school years;

receives, in the third year of any three-year period of continuous employment with the district, an evaluation under the district’s evaluation system stating that the teacher’s performance meets the district performance standards; and

on or before October 15 of the school year,

accepts a contract for employment as a teacher in the district for a fourth consecutive school year; and

performs a day of teaching services in the district during that school year.

In this section, a full school year of employment means employment that begins on or before the first student count day required by the department in a school year or October 15, whichever occurs first, and continues through the remainder of the school year.

A superintendent may not acquire or maintain tenure in a district.

A teacher who has acquired tenure in a school district in the state and who loses tenure in the district because of a break in service may reacquire tenure in that school district under this subsection if the break in service was not the result of a dismissal under AS

14.20.170

or nonretention under AS

14.20.175

and did not last longer than one year. A break in service that begins on or after the last day of a school district’s instructional days for a school year but before the first instructional day of the next school year will be considered to have lasted no longer than one year if the teacher is employed on the first instructional day of the school year that begins more than 12 but not more than 16 months after the beginning of the break in service. A previously tenured teacher reacquires tenure in the school district under this subsection when the teacher

possesses a valid teaching certificate that authorizes the teacher to be employed as a certificated teacher or as an administrator under regulations adopted by the department;

has been employed as a teacher in the district continuously for one full school year after a break in service that does not exceed the time limits set out in this subsection;

receives, under the district’s evaluation system, an acceptable evaluation from the district; and

on or before October 15 of the school year,

accepts a contract for employment as a teacher in the district for a second consecutive school year; and

performs a day of teaching services in the district during that school year.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a teacher who has acquired tenure in a school district who moves to a new school district acquires tenure in the new school district on the first instructional day of the third year of employment in the new school district if

the teacher otherwise meets the qualifications for tenure set out in (a) of this section; and

the break in service meets the requirements of (d) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 92 SLA 1960; am § 17 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 31 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 89 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the Department of Administration to present to the legislature no later than June 15, 2015 a proposed salary and benefits schedule for school districts and recommendations for teacher tenure, see sec. 52, ch. 15, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For employment of professional personnel, see 4 AAC 18.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 31, SLA 1996 provides that the amendments to this section made by ch. 31, SLA 1996 apply only to an individual (1) first hired as a teacher by a school district or regional educational attendance area, including Mt. Edgecumbe High School, on or after August 16, 1996, or (2) rehired as a teacher by a school district or regional educational attendance area, including Mt. Edgecumbe High School, on or after August 16, 1996 and following an interruption in continuous service and the interruption resulted either in a loss of tenure rights under AS

14.20.160

or in a failure to acquire tenure rights under AS

14.20.150

.

Sec. 14.20.155.
Effect of tenure rights.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a teacher who has acquired tenure rights has the right to employment within the district during continuous service.

A teacher who has acquired tenure rights may agree to a new contract at any time. However, if the teacher fails to agree to a new contract, the provisions of the previous contract are continued subject to AS

14.20.158

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 31 SLA 1996)

Sec. 14.20.158.
Continued contract provisions.

Continuation of the provisions of a teacher’s contract under AS

14.20.145

or

14.20.155

does not

affect the alteration of the teacher’s salary in accordance with the salary schedule prescribed by state law, or in accordance with a local salary schedule applicable to all teachers in the district and adopted by bylaws;

limit the right of the employer to assign the teacher to any teaching, administrative, or counseling position for which the teacher is qualified; or

limit the right of the employer to assign the teacher, as is reasonably necessary, to any school in the district.

History.

(§ 19 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.160.
Loss of tenure rights.

Tenure rights are lost when the teacher’s employment in the district is interrupted or terminated. However, a teacher on layoff status does not lose tenure rights during the period of layoff except as provided under AS

14.20.177

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 92 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1965; am § 20 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 22 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 31 SLA 1996)

Sec. 14.20.165.
Restoration of tenure rights.

A teacher who held tenure rights and who was retired due to disability under AS

14.25.130

, but whose disability (1) has been removed, and the removal of that disability is certified by a competent physician following a physical or mental examination, or (2) has been compensated for by rehabilitation or other appropriate restorative education or training, and that rehabilitation or restoration to health has been certified by the division of vocational rehabilitation of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, shall be restored to full tenure rights in the district from which the teacher was retired, at such time as an opening for which the teacher is qualified becomes available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 71 SLA 1975; am § 5 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 14.20.170.
Dismissal.

A teacher, including a teacher who has acquired tenure rights, may be dismissed at any time only for the following causes:

incompetency, which is defined as the inability or the unintentional or intentional failure to perform the teacher’s customary teaching duties in a satisfactory manner;

immorality, which is defined as the commission of an act that, under the laws of the state, constitutes a crime involving moral turpitude; or

substantial noncompliance with the school laws of the state, the regulations or bylaws of the department, the bylaws of the district, or the written rules of the superintendent.

A teacher may be suspended temporarily with regular compensation during a period of investigation to determine whether or not cause exists for the issuance of a notification of dismissal according to AS

14.20.180

.

A teacher who is dismissed under this section is not entitled to a plan of improvement under AS

14.20.149

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1960; am § 21 ch 98 SLA 1966; am §§ 1, 2 ch 104 SLA 1966; am § 8 ch 31 SLA 1996)

Sec. 14.20.175.
Nonretention.

A teacher who has not acquired tenure rights is subject to nonretention for the school year following the expiration of the teacher’s contract for any cause that the employer determines to be adequate. However, at the teacher’s request, the teacher is entitled to a written statement of the cause for nonretention. The boards of city and borough school districts and regional educational attendance areas shall provide by regulation or bylaw a procedure under which a nonretained teacher may request and receive an informal hearing by the board.

A teacher who has acquired tenure rights is subject to nonretention for the following school year only for the following causes:

the school district demonstrates that

the district has fully complied with the requirements of AS

14.20.149

with respect to the tenured teacher;

the teacher’s performance, after completion of the plan of improvement, failed to meet the performance objectives set out in the plan; and

the evaluation of the teacher established that the teacher does not meet the district performance standards;

immorality, which is defined as the commission of an act that, under the laws of the state, constitutes a crime involving moral turpitude; or

substantial noncompliance with the school laws of the state, the regulations or bylaws of the department, the bylaws of the district, or the written rules of the superintendent.

History.

(§ 22 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1968; am § 13 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 15 ch 124 SLA 1975; am § 9 ch 31 SLA 1996)

Sec. 14.20.177.
Reductions in force.

A school district may implement a layoff plan under this section if it is necessary for the district to reduce the number of tenured teachers because

school attendance in the district has decreased; or

the basic need of the school district determined under AS

14.17.410(b)(1)

decreases by three percent or more from the previous year.

Before a school district lays off any tenured teacher, the school board shall adopt a layoff plan. The plan must identify academic and other programs that the district intends to maintain in implementing the layoff plan. The plan must also include procedures for layoff and recall of tenured teachers consistent with this section.

Except as provided in this subsection, a school district may place a tenured teacher on layoff status only after the district has given notice of nonretention to all nontenured teachers. However, a school district may retain a nontenured teacher and place on layoff status a tenured teacher if there is no tenured teacher in the district who is qualified to replace the nontenured teacher. The school district shall comply with the notice requirements set out in AS

14.20.140

in placing a tenured or nontenured teacher on layoff status.

For purposes of this section, a tenured teacher is considered qualified for a position if the position is in

grades K — 8 and the teacher has an elementary endorsement;

an established middle school and the teacher has

an elementary endorsement;

a middle school endorsement; or

a secondary certificate with a subject area endorsement in the area of assignment in which the teacher filling the position will spend at least 40 percent of the teacher’s time or the teacher has, within the five years immediately preceding the last date on which the teacher performed teaching services in the district before being laid off, received an evaluation stating that the teacher’s performance in the subject or subjects meets the district performance standards; or

grades 9 — 12 and the teacher has an endorsement for each subject area in which the teacher filling the position will spend at least 40 percent of the teacher’s time or the teacher has, within the five years immediately preceding the last date on which the teacher performed teaching services in the district before being laid off, received an evaluation stating that the teacher’s performance in the subject or subjects meets the district performance standards.

For a period of three years after layoff, a teacher is on layoff status and is entitled to a hiring preference in the district where the teacher had been employed. The hiring preference applies only to vacant teaching positions for which the teacher is qualified. If a teacher is offered a teaching position under this subsection and the teacher declines the offer or fails to accept it within 30 days, the teacher is no longer considered to be on layoff status and is no longer entitled to a hiring preference under this section unless the teacher declines the offer because the teacher is contractually obligated to provide professional services to another private or public educational program.

Notwithstanding any provision of AS 23.40, the terms of a collective bargaining agreement entered into between a school district and a bargaining organization representing teachers on or after August 16, 1996, may not be in conflict with the provisions of this section.

A teacher on layoff status is not entitled to be reemployed under AS

14.20.145

and does not accrue leave. However, layoff status does not constitute a break in service for retaining tenure rights and accrued sick leave.

In this section, “school district” or “district” means a city or borough school district or a regional educational attendance area.

History.

(§ 10 ch 31 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 28 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Sec. 14.20.180.
Procedures upon notice of dismissal or nonretention.

Before a teacher is dismissed, the employer shall give the teacher written notice of the proposed dismissal and a pretermination hearing. A pretermination hearing under this section must comport with the minimum requirements of due process, including an explanation of the employer’s evidence and basis for the proposed dismissal and an opportunity for the teacher to respond. If, following a pretermination hearing, an employer determines that dismissal is appropriate, the employer shall provide written notice, including a statement of cause and a complete bill of particulars, of the decision. The dismissal is effective when the notice is delivered to the teacher.

An employer that has decided to nonretain a tenured teacher shall provide the teacher with written notice, including a statement of cause and a complete bill of particulars. The notice must comply with AS

14.20.140(a)

.

Within 15 days after receipt of a decision of dismissal under (a) of this section or nonretention under (b) of this section, a teacher may notify the employer in writing that the teacher is requesting a hearing before the school board under (d) of this section or that the teacher is invoking the grievance procedures under (e) of this section.

Upon receipt of a request for a hearing, the employer shall immediately schedule a hearing and notify the teacher in writing of the date, time, and place of the hearing. The teacher may elect to have either a public or a private hearing, and to have the hearing under oath or affirmation. The parties have a right to be represented by counsel and to cross-examine witnesses. The teacher has the right to subpoena a person who has made statements that are used as a basis for the employer’s decision to dismiss or nonretain. A written transcript, tape, or similar recording of the proceedings shall be kept. A copy of the recording shall be furnished to the teacher, for cost, upon request of the teacher. A decision of the school board requires a majority vote of the membership, by roll call. The board’s decision shall be in writing and must contain specific findings of fact and conclusions of law. A copy of the decision shall be furnished to the teacher within 10 days after the date of the decision. If the school board sustains the dismissal or nonretention, the teacher may appeal the decision to the superior court for judicial review based on the administrative record.

Upon receipt of a notice invoking the grievance procedures, the school board shall immediately schedule an informal hearing and notify the teacher in writing of the date, time, and place of the hearing. The hearing is for the purpose of reviewing the statement of cause and bill of particulars and not for the purpose of taking evidence. The teacher may choose whether the informal hearing is held in public or in private. A decision of the school board requires a majority vote of the membership, by roll call. The board’s decision shall be in writing. The board shall promptly furnish a copy of the decision to the teacher. If the board sustains the dismissal or nonretention, the teacher may, within 15 days after receipt of the decision, give written notice to the school board and submit the matter to arbitration under the rules of the American Arbitration Association. The decision of the arbitrator is final and binding on the school board, the teacher, and the bargaining organization representing the teacher, if any. If the school board and the teacher agree, they may waive the informal hearing under this subsection and submit the matter directly to arbitration.

History.

(§ 3a ch 92 SLA 1960; am § 23 ch 98 SLA 1966; am §§ 2, 3 ch 11 SLA 1968; am § 14 ch 46 SLA 1970; am §§ 16, 17 ch 124 SLA 1975; am § 11 ch 31 SLA 1996)

Secs. 14.20.185 — 14.20.200.
Procedure and hearing; appeals. [Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 14.20.205.
Judicial review. [Repealed, § 14 ch 31 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 14.20.207.
[Renumbered as AS 14.20.215.]

Sec. 14.20.210.
Authority of school board or department to adopt bylaws.

A school board or the department may adopt teacher tenure bylaws not in conflict with the regulations of the department or state law.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 1960; am § 26 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.215.
Definitions.

In AS

14.20.010

—

14.20.215

,

“continuous employment” means employment that is without interruption except for temporary absences approved by the employer or its designee, or except for the interval between consecutive school terms if the teacher is employed only for the months of the school term;

“dismissal” means termination by the employer of the contract services of the teacher during the time a teacher’s contract is in force, and termination of the right to the balance of the compensation due the teacher under the contract;

“district performance standards” means evaluation criteria for the district’s teachers and administrators that are adopted by a school district under AS

14.20.149

and that are based on the professional performance standards adopted by the department;

“employer” means the school board or superintendent that appoints the teacher;

“nonretention” means the election by an employer not to reemploy a teacher for the school year or school term immediately following the expiration of the teacher’s current contract;

“school year” includes “school term” if the teacher is employed only for the period of the school term;

“teacher” means an individual who, for compensation, has primary responsibility to plan, instruct, and evaluate learning of elementary or secondary school students in the classroom or an equivalent setting and also includes individuals holding other positions as determined by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 25 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 15 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 19, ch 124 SLA 1975; am § 9 ch 151 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 76 SLA 1992; am § 12 ch 31 SLA 1996; am § 42 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.20.207

. Renumbered and reorganized to alphabetize the defined terms in 1987. Paragraph (3) was enacted as (8); renumbered in 1996, at which time former (3) — (7) were renumbered as (4) — (8).